Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-1707
Services, vehicles, and equipment; authority to contract for; requirements.

Any city or village shall have the authority to contract with other political subdivisions, government agencies, public corporations, private persons, or groups for (1) compensation for services rendered by such city or village or (2) the use of vehicles and equipment of the city or village. Such services shall be of a type which the city or village is empowered to perform and the vehicles or equipment shall be of a type which the city or village is empowered to use, as otherwise provided by law. Any person performing such services shall have completed any training requirements of his or her profession as required by law. The compensation agreed upon shall be a legal charge and collectible by the entity rendering such services in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 1959, c. 55, § 2, p. 248;

Laws 1984, LB 782, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 94.
August 28, 2021